South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5089.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Beaufort County voting precincts SECTION 1.    Section 7-7-110(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) The precinct lines defining the above precincts are as shown on the official map on file with the Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Office designated as document P-13-26, and as shown on copies provided to the Board of Voter Registration and Elections of Beaufort County by the Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Office. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 1st day of April, 2026. Approved the 6th day of April, 2026. __________